Missouri, session 2026, HB3119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.020 and 302.026, RSMo, are repealed and one new section
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 302.020, to read as follows:
302.020. 1. Unless otherwise provided for by law, it shall be unlawful for any person,
except those expressly exempted by section 302.080, to:
(1) Operate any vehicle upon any highway in this state unless the person has a valid
license;
(2) Operate a motorcycle or motortricycle upon any highway of this state unless such
person has a valid license that shows the person has successfully passed an examination for
the operation of a motorcycle or motortricycle as prescribed by the director. The director may
indicate such upon a valid license issued to such person, or shall issue a license restricting the
applicant to the operation of a motorcycle or motortricycle if the actual demonstration,
required by section 302.173, is conducted on such vehicle;
(3) Authorize or knowingly permit a motorcycle or motortricycle owned by such
person or under such person's control to be driven upon any highway by any person whose
license does not indicate that the person has passed the examination for the operation of a
motorcycle or motortricycle or has been issued an instruction permit therefor;
(4) Operate a motor vehicle with an instruction permit or license issued to another
person.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3119 2
2. Every person [under twenty-six years of age] who is operating or riding as a
passenger on any motorcycle or motortricycle, as defined in section 301.010, upon any
highway of this state shall wear protective headgear at all times the vehicle is in motion[;
except that, any person twenty-six years of age or older operating any motorcycle or
motortricycle who has been issued an instruction permit shall wear protective headgear at all
times the vehicle is in motion]. The protective headgear shall meet reasonable standards and
specifications established by the director. [No political subdivision of this state shall impose
a protective headgear requirement on the operator or passenger of a motorcycle or
motortricycle. No person shall be stopped, inspected, or detained solely to determine
compliance with this subsection.]
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 302.340 any person convicted of
violating subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. A
first violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of this section shall be punishable as a
class D misdemeanor. A second violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of this
section shall be punishable as a class A misdemeanor. Any person convicted a third or
subsequent time of violating subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of this section is guilty of a
class E felony. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 302.340, violation of subdivisions
(3) and (4) of subsection 1 of this section is a misdemeanor, the first violation punishable as a
class D misdemeanor, a second or subsequent violation of this section punishable as a class C
misdemeanor, and the penalty for failure to wear protective headgear as required by
subsection 2 of this section is an infraction for which a fine not to exceed twenty-five dollars
may be imposed. Notwithstanding all other provisions of law and court rules to the contrary,
no court costs shall be imposed upon any person due to such violation. No points shall be
assessed pursuant to section 302.302 for a failure to wear such protective headgear. Prior
pleas of guilty and prior findings of guilty shall be pleaded and proven in the same manner as
required by section 558.021.
[302.026. 1. Any qualified motorcycle operator who is twenty-six
years of age or older may operate a motorcycle or motortricycle upon any
highway of this state without wearing protective headgear if he or she in
addition to maintaining proof of financial responsibility in accordance with
chapter 303, is covered by a health insurance policy or other form of insurance
which will provide the person with medical benefits for injuries incurred as a
result of an accident while operating or riding on a motorcycle or
motortricycle.
2. Proof of coverage required by subsection 1 of this section shall be
provided, upon request by authorized law enforcement, by showing a copy of
the qualified operator's insurance card.

HB 3119 3
3. No person shall be stopped, inspected, or detained solely to
determine compliance with this section.]
✔